Massachusetts, session 194th, S2896.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding Chapter 132B of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the Town of Manchester-by-the-Sea may, by bylaw, prohibit or
restrict the application of seconded generation anticoagulant rodenticides within the Town of
Manchester-by-the-Sea, including the application of such pesticides by licensed commercial
applicators as defined in 333 C.M.R. 10.00.
of 1